Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,213
Nebraska Emergency Management Agency; Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; duties.

(1) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall supervise and coordinate emergency planning and training under section 305 of Title III and shall oversee and distribute all funds received under section 305 of Title III and section 81-15,214.

(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall receive emergency notification and facility reports and establish procedures for receiving and processing requests from the public for information as required to be provided under the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act. The director or his or her designee shall serve as commission coordinator for information.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 23;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 148;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 436.